North Dakota, session 69, SB2101.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATIVE ASSEMBLY OF NORTH DAKOTA:
SECTION 1. AMENDMENT. Subsection 1 of section 23-27-04 of the North Dakota Century Code is
amended and reenacted as follows:
1. An emergency medical services operation within this state may not operate unless the
operation is licensed in accordance withunder this chapter and. The department shall adopt
rules adopted by the department of health and human services. The rulesfor standards for
operators which must include:
a. Time when operator's services must be available.;
b. Requirements for services to ensure a reliable response to 911 and emergent interfacility
transports, while providing nonemergent services;
c. Type of motor vehicle operator's license needed for drivers of ground vehicles.;
c.d. Training standards for operation personnel.;
d.e. Equipment and ground vehicle standards.;
e.f. Annual license fees.;
f.g. Number of personnel required for each run.;
g.h. The scope of practice for uncertified drivers, certified personnel, and emergency medical
services professionals.;
h.i. Performance standards, which may include response time standards.; and
i.j. Other requirements as may be found necessary to carry out the intentrequirements of
this chapter.

S. B. NO. 2101 - PAGE 2
____________________________ ____________________________
President of the Senate Speaker of the House
____________________________ ____________________________
Secretary of the Senate Chief Clerk of the House
This certifies that the within bill originated in the Senate of the Sixty-ninth Legislative Assembly of North
Dakota and is known on the records of that body as Senate Bill No. 2101.
Senate Vote: Yeas 47 Nays 0 Absent 0
House Vote: Yeas 86 Nays 2 Absent 6
____________________________
Secretary of the Senate
Received by the Governor at ________M. on _____________________________________, 2025.
Approved at ________M. on __________________________________________________, 2025.
____________________________
Governor
Filed in this office this ___________day of _______________________________________, 2025,
at ________ o’clock ________M.
____________________________
Secretary of State